nl: Buisvorm: Ovale buizen; Rechthoekige buizen; Ronde buizen; Vierkante buizen; Anders
tr: Boru kesit şekli: Oval boru; Dikdörtgen boru; Yuvarlak boru; Kare boru; Diğer
ru: Форма трубок: Овальные трубы; Прямоугольные трубы; Круглые трубы; Квадратные трубы; Другое
sk-SK: Tvary hadičiek: Oválna trubica; Obdĺžniková trubica; Okrúhla trubica; Štvorcová trubica; Iný
fi: Putkiston muoto: Soikea putki; Suorakulmainen putki; Pyöreä putki; Neliöputki; Muu
pt-BR: Tubo formato: Tubo oval; Tubo retangular; Tubo redondo; Tubo quadrado; Outro
vi: Hình dạng ống: Ống hình bầu dục; Ống hình chữ nhật; Ống tròn; Ống vuông; Khác
bg-BG: Форма на тръбната гума: Овални тръби; Правоъгълни тръби; Кръгли тръби; Квадратни тръби; Друга
es: Formas de tubos: Tubería ovalada; Tubería rectangular; Tubería redonda; Tubería cuadrada; Otro
el: Σχήμα σωλήνων: Οβάλ σωλήνωση; Ορθογώνια σωλήνωση; Στρογγυλή σωλήνωση; Τετράγωνη σωλήνωση; Άλλο
sl-SI: Oblika cevi: Ovalne cevi; Pravokotne cevi; Okrogle cevi; Kvadratne cevi; Drugo
hr-HR: Oblik cijevi: Ovalne cijevi; Pravokutne cijevi; Okrugle cijevi; Kvadratne cijevi; Ostalo
de: Rohrform: Ovalrohr; Rechteckrohr; Rundrohr; Vierkantrohr; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 管材形狀: 橢圓管; 矩形管; 圓管; 方管; 其他
en: Tubing shape: Oval tubing; Rectangular tubing; Round tubing; Square tubing; Other
da: Rørform: Ovale rør; Rektangulære rør; Runde rør; Firkantede rør; Andet
lt-LT: Vamzdžių formos: Ovalūs vamzdžiai; Stačiakampiai vamzdžiai; Apvalūs vamzdžiai; Kvadratiniai vamzdžiai; Kita
zh-CN: 管材形状: 椭圆管; 矩形管; 圆管; 方管; 其他
pt-PT: Forma da tubagem: Tubos ovais; Tubos retangulares; Tubos redondos; Tubos quadrados; Outro
ko: 튜빙 모양: 타원형 튜빙; 직사각형 튜빙; 원형 튜빙; 정사각형 튜빙; 기타
cs: Profil trubek konstrukce: Oválný profil; Obdélníkový profil; Kulatý profil; Čtvercový profil; Ostatní
it: Forma dei tubi: Tubolare ovale; Tubolare rettangolare; Tubolare rotondo; Tubolare quadrato; Altro
ro-RO: Forma tubulaturii: Tuburi ovale; Tuburi dreptunghiulare; Tuburi rotunde; Tuburi pătrate; Altele
nb: Rørform: Ovale rør; Rektangulære rør; Runde rør; Firkantede rør; Annet
sv: Rörform: Ovala rör; Rektangulära rör; Runda rör; Fyrkantsrör; Annat
ja: チューブ形状: 楕円形チューブ; 長方形チューブ; 円形チューブ; 正方形チューブ; その他
pl: Kształt rurki: Rury owalne; Rury prostokątne; Rury okrągłe; Rury kwadratowe; Inne
fr: Forme des tubes: Tube ovale; Tube rectangulaire; Tube rond; Tube carré; Autre
th: รูปทรงท่อ: ท่อวงรี; ท่อสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ท่อกลม; ท่อสี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัส; อื่นๆ
hu: Csőforma: Ovális cső; Téglalap alakú cső; Kerek cső; Négyzet alakú cső; Egyéb